Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB901.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 78.510 TO 78.852 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510
to 78.852 to the contrary:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Employer's effective election date" means the last day of the system's plan
year in the year in which the employer has made an election as provided by
subsection (2) of this section, provided the employer has met the
requirements of this section;
(b) "Tier II benefits" means the benefits provided to a member who began
participating in the County Employees Retirement System immediately prior
to January 1, 2014; and
(c) "Tier III benefits" means the benefits provided to a member who began
participating in the County Employees Retirement System on or after
January 1, 2014.
(2) (a) Effective July 1, 2027, and subject to the provisions of this section,
employers participating in the County Employees Retirement System may
make a one (1) time irrevocable election to provide Tier II benefits to
employees of the employer who are participating in a hazardous position in
the County Employees Retirement System with the employer and who are
accruing or would otherwise accrue Tier III benefits for their service to the
employer.
(b) If an employer decides to make an election as provided by paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the employer shall:
Page 1 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
1. Adopt a resolution electing Tier II benefits for employees in a
hazardous position who are currently being provided Tier III benefits
and shall submit the resolution to the board for its approval at least six
(6) months prior to the employer's desired effective election date; and
2. Agree to pay the additional actuarial costs to the system for making
the election as provided by Section 6 of this Act.
(c) An employer may request, at any time, an estimate of the cost to make an
election as provided by this subsection, provided the employer pays all costs
to perform the estimate.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by this section:
(a) Any employee participating in Tier III benefits in a hazardous position
through the employer on the employer's effective election date may, within
thirty (30) days of the employer's effective election date, individually make
an irrevocable election to participate in Tier II benefits for any future
participating service in a hazardous position with the employer. If such
election is made:
1. All service accrued on or after January 1, 2014, in a hazardous
position in the system with the employer shall be converted to Tier II
service and shall be presumed as service credit earned immediately
prior to January 1, 2014, for purposes of determining benefits
provided by KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
2. The member's accumulated contributions shall remain in the
member's account; and
3. The accumulated employer credit for the Tier III benefit with the
employer shall be transferred to the retirement allowance account as
provided by KRS 78.650.
If an employee eligible to make an election as provided by this paragraph
Page 2 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
does not or fails to make an irrevocable election to participate in Tier II
benefits as provided by this paragraph, then the employee shall remain
under Tier III benefit coverage.
(b) Any other employee hired on or after the employer's effective election date
who would otherwise participate in Tier III benefits in a hazardous position
shall participate in Tier II benefits for any prospective participating service
with the employer, but any prior service accrued prior to the employee's hire
date shall not be impacted except as provided by paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) As provided by Section 5 of this Act, an employee who is participating in
Tier II benefits pursuant to this section or their employer if the employer
has made an election to provide Tier II benefits pursuant to this section,
may pay the costs to convert any other Tier III benefit service in a
hazardous position to Tier II benefit service.
(4) An employee who is eligible to make a one (1) time irrevocable election provided
by subsection (3)(a) of this section shall not have the option to change or make a
new election under any circumstances relating to a change in employment or
reemployment with a participating employer, including employment or
reemployment with a different employer.
(5) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Retired members who are reemployed on or after September 1, 2008, and
who are not eligible to participate in the systems during reemployment; or
(c) Any individual who made an election to participate in the hybrid cash
balance plan as provided by Section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 61.5955 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510 to
78.852 to the contrary:
Page 3 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(1) Subject to the provisions of this section, any member who began participating in the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees Retirement
System, or the State Police Retirement System on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, may in lieu of the benefits he or she is currently eligible to
receive from the systems, elect to receive the benefits and rights provided to
members who began participating in the systems on or after January 1, 2014,
including participating in the hybrid cash balance plan created pursuant to KRS
61.597 or 78.5512 for members in nonhazardous duty positions or pursuant to KRS
16.583 or 78.5516 for members in hazardous duty positions, as applicable;
(2) The election provided by this section shall be made in writing and on a form
prescribed by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority and shall apply to all service
or accounts in the Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees
Retirement System;
(3) For each member who makes an election provided by this section:
(a) Any service credit the member has accrued prior to January 1, 2014, shall be
considered as service credit earned on or after January 1, 2014, for purposes
of determining benefits under KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and
78.510 to 78.852;
(b) On the member's effective election date, the value of the member's
accumulated contributions, less any interest, shall be deposited into the
member's hybrid cash balance account as provided by KRS 16.583, 61.597,
78.5512, or 78.5516, as applicable, and considered part of the member's
accumulated account balance;
(c) On the member's effective election date, an employer pay credit as provided
by KRS 16.583, 61.597, 78.5512, or 78.5516, as applicable, shall be added to
the member's accumulated account balance for each month the member
contributed to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County
Page 4 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System prior to
his or her effective election date; and
(d) Interest credits as provided by KRS 16.583, 61.597, 78.5512, or 78.5516, as
applicable, shall only be applied for periods occurring on or after the
member's effective election date;
(4) Before accepting an election provided by this section, the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority shall provide the member with information detailing the potential results
of the member's election;
(5) An election made pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable;
(6) (a) A member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County
Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System shall
not be eligible to make an election prescribed by this section until the
Kentucky Retirement Systems receives a favorable private letter ruling from
the Internal Revenue Service regarding this section.
(b) If the Internal Revenue Service denies the request for a private letter ruling as
provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, this section shall be void.
(c) The Kentucky Public Pensions Authority may promulgate administrative
regulations under KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out this section; and
(7) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Retirees who were reemployed on or after September 1, 2008, and who are
not eligible to participate in the systems during reemployment; or
(b) Members who are participating in Tier II benefits as defined by Section 1 of
this Act based upon an election of an employer pursuant to Section 1 of this
Act.
Section 3. KRS 61.680 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to August 1, 1982, every employee shall be deemed to consent and agree to
any deduction from his or her compensation required by KRS 6.500 to 6.535,
Page 5 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.692, 78.510 to 78.852, and to all other provisions
thereof. Thereafter, employee contributions shall be picked up by the employer
pursuant to KRS 61.560(4).
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of KRS 6.500 to 6.535, 16.505 to
16.652, 61.510 to 61.692, 78.510 to 78.852 and 161.220 to 161.714:
1. Upon death, disability, or service retirement, a member's accounts under
the Legislators' Retirement Plan, State Police Retirement System,
Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees
Retirement System, and Teachers' Retirement System, except for service
prohibited by KRS 161.623(2), shall be consolidated for the purpose of
determining eligibility and amount of benefits, including:
a. [those ]Members who participate in the hybrid cash balance plan
within the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County
Employees Retirement System, and the State Police Retirement
System, on or after January 1, 2014; and[,]
b. Members who have both Tier II benefits and Tier III benefits in
the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County
Employees Retirement System, and the State Police Retirement
System due to an election by an employer to provide Tier II
benefits as provided by Section 1 of this Act;
and regardless of the transition of administration of the County
Employees Retirement System to the County Employees Retirement
System board of trustees;
2. Vested service credit in a retirement system, other than the Teachers'
Retirement System, sponsored by a Kentucky institution of higher
education and accepted by the Kentucky Employees Retirement System
or the County Employees Retirement System, may be used to determine
Page 6 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
eligibility for twenty-seven (27) year retirement for an employee who
begins participating before September 1, 2008, but not the amount of
benefits;
3. The computation of benefits shall be based on the applicable formula in
each system and service credit in each system, but the final
compensation, excluding compensation earned under KRS 161.155(10),
shall be determined as if all service were in one (1) system, including
for those members who have both Tier II benefits and Tier III benefits
in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees
Retirement System, and the State Police Retirement System due to an
election by an employer to provide Tier II benefits as provided by
Section 1 of this Act;
4. If the member has prior service in more than one (1) system
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems, he or she shall obtain at
least twelve (12) months' current service in each system in which he or
she has prior service in order to validate the prior service in each system
for purposes of determining consolidated benefits under this subsection;
and
5. Upon the determination of benefits, each system shall pay the applicable
amount of benefits due the member.
(b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be waived if the
member:
1. Notifies the system of his or her desire to maintain separate retirement
accounts in the State Police Retirement System, Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, or County Employees Retirement System; or
2. Fails to simultaneously retire from all state-administered retirement
systems in which the member has an account or fails to retire from any
Page 7 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
other systems not administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems within
one (1) month of the member's effective retirement date in the systems
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems.
(c) If the member has not contributed at least one (1) year in a system in which he
or she has prior service, his or her current service in the system shall be valid
for purposes of determining eligibility and in computation of benefits on a
consolidated basis.
(3) (a) A member with service credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System,
State Police Retirement System, or the County Employees Retirement System
who becomes the holder of an office entitling him or her to membership in the
Judicial Retirement Plan or the Legislators' Retirement Plan, but who does not
elect within thirty (30) days after taking office in such service to participate in
the plan, in accordance with KRS 6.505 or 21.360, shall be deemed to have
elected to retain membership in the system in which he or she is a member,
either the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement
System, or the County Employees Retirement System. In that event, the
agency employing the member shall withhold employee contributions, or
picked-up employee contributions after August 2, 1982, make employer
contributions and remit these contributions to the system in which the member
retained his or her membership.
(b) Any person entitled to membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan or the
Legislators' Retirement Plan, who does not elect within thirty (30) days after
taking office to participate in the plan, in accordance with KRS 6.505 or
21.360, and who at the time of taking office is not a contributing member of,
or does not have service credit in, any of the retirement systems mentioned in
this section, or the Teachers' Retirement System, shall participate in the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System.
Page 8 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(c) A member of one (1) of the state-administered retirement plans who ceases to
contribute to the plan as provided in KRS 21.360 and who is employed in a
nonelected position by an agency participating in the Kentucky Retirement
Systems or Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System shall be deemed to have
elected membership in the system in which the employer of the nonelected
position participates. A member of one (1) of the state-administered
retirement plans who ceases to contribute to the plan as provided in KRS
21.360 and who is not employed in a nonelected position by an agency
participating in the Kentucky Retirement Systems shall be deemed to have
elected membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.
(4) (a) Prior to July 1, 1976, a person entering the service of an employer
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the County
Employees Retirement System with service credit in the Teachers' Retirement
System and who desires to retain membership in the Teachers' Retirement
System, and who is permitted by that system to continue, shall be exempt
from participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the
County Employees Retirement System.
(b) Any person who has elected to retain membership in the Teachers' Retirement
System as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection may cancel his or her
election and participate in the system under which his or her position would
normally participate, if he or she elects to cancel his or her option prior to
January 1, 1977.
(c) Any member of the General Assembly who upon election is a contributing
member of the Teachers' Retirement System and who does not elect within
thirty (30) days after taking office to participate in the Legislators' Retirement
Plan, in accordance with KRS 6.505, shall during his or her term of office
participate in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System unless an election
Page 9 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
to retain membership in the Teachers' Retirement System is filed in writing
within ninety (90) days after his or her term of office begins. No contributions
may be made to the Teachers' Retirement System for the same period of
service under the Legislators' Retirement Plan or the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System as a member of the General Assembly, but contributions
made to the Teachers' Retirement System while a member of the General
Assembly shall be transferred to the Legislators' Retirement Plan, as provided
for in KRS 6.535, when the member elects to join the Legislators' Retirement
Plan, and service credit in the Legislators' Retirement Plan shall be granted as
provided for in KRS 6.505(5).
(5) Any member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or County Employees
Retirement System who is working in a position covered by one (1) of these
retirement systems and his or her employee contributions, service credit and
employer contributions made on his or her behalf are being transferred to the other
retirement system shall contribute to the system in which his or her employer
participates, or after August 1, 1982, the employer shall pick up the employee
contributions, and no further contributions or service credit shall be transferred to
the system in which he or she elected to retain membership, as subsection (2) of this
section eliminates the necessity of the transfers.
(6) (a) Except as provided by KRS 61.545(3)(b)2., any member of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System or County Employees Retirement System who
is working in more than one (1) position covered by the same retirement
system, shall have his or her wages and contributions consolidated and his or
her retirement account administered as a single account. If part-time positions
are involved, an accumulation of all hours worked within the same retirement
system shall be used to determine eligibility under KRS 61.510(21).
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an individual serving as a
Page 10 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
volunteer who is receiving compensation from the employer equal to or less
than a nominal fee as defined by KRS 61.510 and 78.510 if the compensation
paid to the volunteer is excluded from the definition of creditable
compensation as provided by KRS 61.510(13) or 78.510(13).
(7) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a person who
does not have the amount of service required for service retirement in the
State Police Retirement System, Kentucky Employees Retirement System,
County Employees Retirement System, Legislators' Retirement Plan, or
Teachers' Retirement System, but who is a member of one (1) of the systems
or is a former member of one (1) or more of the systems with valid service
credit therein, shall become eligible for service retirement benefits attributable
to the amount of his or her actual service credit in each system in which he or
she has service credit when his or her combined service credit in all the
systems, plus any service credit he or she has in the Judicial Retirement Plan,
is equal to that required for service retirement in each respective system. The
computation of benefits shall be based on the applicable formula in each
system and service credit in each system, except that total service in all
systems, unless prohibited by KRS 161.623(2), shall be used to determine the
reduction for early retirement, if any. Except as provided in KRS 21.360, the
final compensation shall be determined by using the creditable compensation
reported to the State Police Retirement System, Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, Legislators'
Retirement Plan, or Teachers' Retirement System and only as much of the
compensation earned in the Judicial Retirement Plan as is needed to satisfy
the final compensation requirement applicable in the respective retirement
systems.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be waived if the member fails to
Page 11 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
simultaneously retire from all state-administered retirement systems in which
the member has an account or fails to retire from any other systems not
administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems within one (1) month of the
member's effective retirement date in the systems administered by the
Kentucky Retirement Systems.
(8) Each retirement system from which the member retires shall pay a retirement
allowance upon receipt of required forms and documents, except that no retirement
system shall pay a retirement allowance or annuity until all forms and documents
are filed at all retirement systems in compliance with each system's requirements.
Section 4. KRS 78.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the County Employees Retirement System created by KRS 78.510
to 78.852;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 78.782;
(3) "County" means any county, or nonprofit organization created and governed by a
county, counties, or elected county officers, sheriff and his or her employees,
county clerk and his or her employees, circuit clerk and his or her deputies, former
circuit clerks or former circuit clerk deputies, or political subdivision or
instrumentality, including school boards, cities, charter county governments, urban-
county governments, consolidated local governments, or unified local governments
participating in the system by order appropriate to its governmental structure, as
provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing to accept the agency,
organization, or corporation, the board being hereby granted the authority to
determine the eligibility of the agency to participate;
(4) "School board" means:
(a) Any board of education participating in the system by order appropriate to its
governmental structure, as provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing
Page 12 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
to accept the agency or corporation, the board being hereby granted the
authority to determine the eligibility of the agency to participate; or
(b) A public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590 if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan;
(5) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(6) "Employee" means every regular full-time appointed or elective officer or
employee of a participating county and the coroner of a participating county,
whether or not he or she qualifies as a regular full-time officer. The term shall not
include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency,
temporary, and part-time workers. In case of any doubt, the board shall determine if
a person is an employee within the meaning of KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(7) "Employer" means a county, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, the elected
officials of a county, or any authority of the county having the power to appoint or
elect an employee to office or employment in the county;
(8) "Member" means any employee who is included in the membership of the system
or any former employee whose membership has not ceased under KRS 78.535;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this
section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an
employee, on and after July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation is paid and
employee contributions deducted, except as otherwise provided;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a
fraction of a year, of employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1958, for which
creditable compensation was paid. An employee shall be credited with one (1)
month of prior service only in those months he or she received compensation for at
least one hundred (100) hours of work. Twelve (12) months of current service in the
Page 13 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
system shall be required to validate prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all amounts deducted from the
compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the
members' account, including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4), together with interest credited, on the amounts,
and any other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest
credited thereon. "Accumulated contributions" shall not include employee
contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h) within the fund established in KRS 78.520, as prescribed by KRS
78.5536(3)(b);
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Except as limited by paragraph (c) of this subsection, means all salary, wages,
and fees, including payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as
a result of services performed for the employer or for time during which the
member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's federal form
W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other
compensation", including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The creditable compensation of fee officers
who receive salary, fees, maintenance, or other perquisites as a result of their
official duties is the gross amount received decreased by the cost of salary
paid deputies and clerks and the cost of office supplies and other official
expenses;
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for
purchase of service credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's
service with the system in which it is recorded if it is equal to or greater
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
Page 14 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites,
but the board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid
in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an
order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or for any creditable
compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky
Commission on Human Rights, including notices of violations of state
or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or federal
discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during
which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer.
This subparagraph shall also include lump-sum payments for reinstated
wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the period
during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the
employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by
virtue of the member having taken a voluntary salary reduction provided
for under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made
available on or after January 1, 2001, for calendar years on or after
January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross income of the
employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for
accrued vacation leave, sick leave except as provided in KRS 78.616(5),
and other items determined by the board;
Page 15 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008,
lump-sum payments for compensatory time;
3. Training incentive payments for city officers paid as set out in KRS
64.5277 to 64.5279;
4. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016,
nominal fees paid for services as a volunteer; and
5. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky
State Police school resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the
member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest
average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit
during that five (5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years
may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of
service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-eight (48), one
(1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective
retirement date is between August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose
total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years and whose age and years
of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the
member was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number
of months of service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by
twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal
Page 16 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
years shall be used;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a hazardous position, as provided in KRS 78.5520, the creditable
compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was
paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The
three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number
of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-
four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than
twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be used;
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the
creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) complete fiscal
years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of
service credit. If the member does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that
each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more
additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of
service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final
compensation calculation is at least sixty (60) months; or
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a hazardous position as provided
in KRS 78.5520, the creditable compensation of the member during the three
(3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final
compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the
member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve
Page 17 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years,
which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be
added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at
least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were
calculated during the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the
member's effective retirement date, and shall include employee contributions
picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The rate shall be
certified to the system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used
to convert the rate to an annual rate: two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8)
hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and one-
half (7.5) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks,
twelve (12) months, one (1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is
entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the
basis of the actuarial tables adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement,
the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be computed by adding ten (10) years
to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social Security
adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's
actual age shall be used. For members who begin participating in the system prior
to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement option shall be less than the same option
computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date", unless otherwise provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852,
means:
(a) For a member with service in a nonhazardous position, the sixty-fifth birthday
of a member;
Page 18 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(b) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
before September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a member's
fifty-fifth birthday; or
(c) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
on or after September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a
member's sixtieth birthday;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30, which shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the
limitation year used to determine contribution and benefits limits as set out in 26
U.S.C. sec. 415;
(20) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating
employer who shall be responsible for forwarding all employer and employee
contributions and a record of the contributions to the system and for performing
other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (6) of this section, shall mean
all positions that average one hundred (100) or more hours per month, determined
by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or fiscal year, or eighty
(80) or more hours per month in the case of noncertified employees of school
boards, determined by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or
school year, unless otherwise specified, except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which
coincide in duration with a particular season or seasons of the year and that
may recur regularly from year to year, in which case the period of time shall
not exceed nine (9) months, except for employees of school boards, in which
case the period of time shall not exceed six (6) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not
Page 19 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
exceeding thirty (30) working days and are nonrenewable; or
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or
the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or
filled specifically for addressing the employer's needs during and as a
result of the declared emergency;
(c) Temporary positions that are positions of employment with a participating
agency for a period of time not to exceed twelve (12) months and not
renewable;
(d) Probationary positions which are positions of employment with a participating
employer that do not exceed twelve (12) months and that are used uniformly
by the participating agency on new employees who would otherwise be
eligible for participation in the system. Probationary positions shall not be
renewable by the participating employer for the same employee, unless the
employee has not been employed with the participating employer for a period
of at least twelve (12) months; or
(e) Part-time positions that are positions that may be permanent in duration, but
that require less than a calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred (100)
hours of work per month, determined by using the number of months actually
worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of duty, except in
case of noncertified employees of school boards, the school term average shall
be eighty (80) hours of work per month, determined by using the number of
months actually worked in a calendar or school year, in the performance of
duty;
(22) "Alternate participation plan" means a method of participation in the system as
provided for by KRS 78.530(3);
(23) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or
any former member who has on file at the retirement office the necessary
Page 20 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the system;
(24) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly,
monthly, or yearly rate of pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of
pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(25) "Beneficiary" means the person, persons, estate, trust, or trustee designated by the
member in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits
in the event of the member's death. As used in KRS 78.5536, beneficiary shall not
mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(26) "Recipient" means the retired member, the person or persons designated as
beneficiary by the member and drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the
member's death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement allowance. An alternate
payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(27) "Person" means a natural person;
(28) "School term or year" means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30;
(29) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building
in Frankfort, unless otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority;
(30) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under
KRS 61.552 means the employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if
age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60) months of service if under the age
of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service in the
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees
Retirement System;
(31) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system
as provided in KRS 78.615;
Page 21 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(32) "Month" means a calendar month;
(33) "Membership date" means:
(a) The date upon which the member began participating in the system as
provided in KRS 78.615; or
(b) December 31, 2013, solely for service converted or accrued as Tier II
benefits pursuant to Sections 1 and 5 of this Act;
(34) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a
retired member, as defined by subsection (23) of this section;
(35) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(36) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(37) "Accumulated employer credit" means the employer pay credit deposited to the
member's account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS
78.5512 and 78.5516;
(38) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS 78.5512 and
78.5516, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and
the member's accumulated employer credit;
(39) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
Page 22 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an
employer participating in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System without
receipt of compensation for services rendered, except for reimbursement of
actual expenses, payment of a nominal fee to offset the costs of performing
the voluntary services, or both; and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or
independent contractor of the employer for which he or she is performing
volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12) months following the
retired member's most recent retirement date;
(40) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not
exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer.
Compensation earned for services as a volunteer from more than one (1)
participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum
provided by this subsection;
(41) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of
KRS 78.5520 or has not been approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(42) "Hazardous position" means a position that meets the requirements of KRS 78.5520
and has been approved by the board as hazardous;
(43) "Level-percentage-of-payroll amortization method" means a method of determining
the annual amortization payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as
expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of years. Under this method,
the percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years
remaining in the set period and the unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be
projected to be fully amortized at the conclusion of the set period;
(44) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The
Page 23 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
twelve (12) months need not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than
twelve (12) months;
(45) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee
contributions are required to be reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or
78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive current service
credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise,
if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(46) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical
signs which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can
be observed; psychiatric signs which are medically demonstrable phenomena
indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation,
or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological,
or psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory
diagnostic techniques, including but not limited to chemical tests,
electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests;
(47) "Hazardous disability" as used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852 means a disability which
results in an employee's total incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous
position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to be totally and permanently
disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;
(48) "Act in line of duty" means, for employees in hazardous positions under KRS
78.5520:
(a) A single act occurring which was required in the performance of the principal
duties of the hazardous position as defined by the job description; or
(b) A single act of violence committed against the employee that is found to be
related to his or her job duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;
(49) "Dependent child" means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child
Page 24 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
of the member who has neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an
unmarried full-time student who has not attained age twenty-two (22). Solely in the
case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in
this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621,
becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in the line of
duty as defined in this section, or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related
injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS
61.621(5)(a), "dependent child" also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled
child of the member, regardless of the child's age, if the child has been determined
to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits or is being claimed as a
qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child's total and permanent disability;
(50) "Normal retirement age" means the age at which the member meets the
requirements for his or her normal retirement date as provided by subsection (18) of
this section;
(51) "Disability retirement date" means the first day of the month following the last day
of paid employment;
(52) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in KRS 16.505 or who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's monthly final rate of pay
or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is
eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the
member's monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable
Page 25 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
compensation earned by the disabled member during his or her last twelve
(12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty or duty-
related injury occurred;
(53) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS
61.505;
(54) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority; and
(55) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed
with regularity and is or may be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or
not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and on-call work.
Section 5. KRS 78.5520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Hazardous position" for employees who began participating in the County
Employees Retirement System prior to September 1, 2008, means any
position whose principal duties involve active law enforcement, including the
positions of probation and parole officer, active fire suppression or
prevention, correctional officers with duties that routinely and regularly
require face-to-face contact with inmates, or other positions, including but not
limited to paramedics and emergency medical technicians, with duties that
require frequent exposure to a high degree of danger or peril and also require
a high degree of physical conditioning; and
(b) "Hazardous position" for employees who begin participating in the County
Employees Retirement System on or after September 1, 2008, means police
officers and firefighters as defined in KRS 61.315(1), paramedics,
correctional officers with duties that routinely and regularly require face-to-
face contact with inmates, and emergency medical technicians, if:
1. The employee's duties require frequent exposure to a high degree of
Page 26 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
danger or peril and a high degree of physical conditioning; and
2. The employee's duties are not primarily clerical or administrative.
(2) (a) Each employer may request of the board hazardous coverage for those
positions as defined in subsection (1) of this section. Upon request, each
employer shall certify to the system, in the manner prescribed by the board,
the names of all employees working in a hazardous position as defined in
subsection (1) of this section for which coverage is requested. The
certification of the employer shall bear the approval of the agent or agency
responsible for the budget of the employer indicating that the required
employer contributions have been provided for in the budget of the employer.
The system shall determine whether the employees whose names have been
certified by the employer are working in positions meeting the definition of a
hazardous position as provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Each employer shall also certify, under penalty of perjury in accordance with
KRS Chapter 523, that each employee's actual job duties are accurately
reflected in the job description provided to the system. The system shall
determine whether the employees whose names have been certified by the
employer are working in positions meeting the definition of a hazardous
position as defined in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The board shall have the authority to remove any employee from hazardous
coverage if the board determines the employee is not working in a hazardous
position or if the employee is classified in a hazardous position but has
individual job duties that do not meet the definition of a hazardous position or
are not accurately reflected in the job descriptions filed by the employer with
the system.
(3) (a) If the employer participated in the system prior to electing hazardous
coverage, the employer may pay to the system the cost of converting the
Page 27 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
nonhazardous service to hazardous service from the date of participation to
the date the payment is made, or the employer may establish a payment
schedule for payment of the cost of the hazardous service above that which
would be funded within the existing employer contribution rate. The employer
may extend the payment schedule to a maximum of thirty (30) years.
Payments made by the employer under this subsection shall be deposited to
the retirement allowance account of the proper retirement or retiree health
fund and shall not be considered accumulated contributions of the individual
members.
(b) If the employer elects not to make the additional payment as provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the employee may pay the cost of converting
the service and provide payment for the cost as provided by KRS 61.552(9).
Payments made by the employee under this subsection shall not be picked up,
as described in KRS 78.610(4), by the employer.
(c) If neither the employer nor employee makes the payment, the service prior to
hazardous position coverage shall remain nonhazardous.
(d) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to members who begin
participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014.
(4) (a) If an employer providing hazardous retirement coverage pursuant to this
section makes an election to convert from Tier III benefits to Tier II
benefits for service with the employer as provided by Section 1 of this Act,
the employee may pay the cost of converting any other Tier III service in a
hazardous position to Tier II service as defined by Section 1 of this Act by
providing payment for the cost as provided by KRS 61.552(9). Payments
made by the employee under this subsection shall not be picked up, as
described in KRS 78.610(4), by the employer.
(b) The employer may, on behalf of the employee, pay the cost of converting
Page 28 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
any service that could be converted under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Payments made by the employer under this subsection shall be deposited to
the retirement allowance account of the proper retirement or retiree health
fund and shall not be considered accumulated contributions of the
individual members.
(5) Any person employed in a hazardous position shall be required to undergo a
thorough medical examination by a licensed physician, and a copy of the medical
report of the physician shall be retained on file by the person's employer and made
available to the system upon request.
(6)[(5)] If doubt exists regarding the benefits payable to a hazardous position
employee under this section, the board shall determine the benefits payable under
KRS 78.510 to 78.852.
Section 6. KRS 78.635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided by subsection (4) of this section, each employer
participating in the County Employees Retirement System as provided for in
KRS 78.510 to 78.852 shall contribute annually to the system an amount
determined by the actuarial valuation completed in accordance with KRS
78.784 and as specified by this section. Employer contributions for the system
shall be equal to the sum of the "normal cost contribution" and the "actuarially
accrued liability contribution."
(b) For purposes of this section, the normal cost contribution shall be computed
as a percentage of pay and shall be an annual amount that is sufficient when
combined with employee contributions to fund benefits earned during the year
in the system. The amount shall be:
1. Paid as a percentage of creditable compensation reported for each
employee participating in the system and accruing benefits; and
2. The same percentage of pay for all employees who are participating in
Page 29 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
the system, except that separate percentage rates shall be developed in
each system for those employers whose employees are participating in
hazardous duty retirement coverage as provided by KRS 78.5520.
(c) For purposes of this section, the actuarially accrued liability contribution shall
be:
1. Computed by amortizing the total unfunded actuarially accrued liability
of the system over a closed period of thirty (30) years beginning with
the 2019 actuarial valuation using the level percentage of payroll
amortization method, except that any increase or decrease in the
unfunded actuarially accrued liability occurring after the completion of
the 2019 actuarial valuation shall be amortized over a closed period of
twenty (20) years beginning with the actuarial valuation in which the
increase or decrease in the unfunded actuarially accrued liability is
recognized. An increase or decrease in the unfunded actuarially accrued
liability may result from, but not be limited to, legislative changes to
benefits, changes in actuarial methods or assumptions, or actuarial gains
or losses. Each employer who makes a one (1) time irrevocable
election as provided by Section 1 of this Act shall also be required to
pay an additional actuarially accrued liability contribution that is
sufficient to fund the conversion of benefits as provided by Section 1
of this Act;
2. Paid as a percentage of payroll on the creditable compensation reported
for each employee participating in the system and accruing benefits; and
3. The same percentage of pay for all employees who are participating in
the system, except that:
a. Separate percentage rates shall be developed in each system for
those employers whose employees are participating in hazardous
Page 30 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
duty retirement coverage as provided by KRS 78.5520; and
b. Employers who make a one (1) time irrevocable election as
provided by Section 1 of this Act shall pay the additional
contribution specified by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(d) The employer contributions computed under this section shall be determined
using:
1. The entry age normal cost funding method;
2. An asset smoothing method that smooths investment gains and losses
over a five (5) year period; and
3. Other funding methods and assumptions established by the board in
accordance with KRS 78.784.
(2) Normal contribution and the actuarially accrued liability contribution rates shall be
determined by the board on the basis of the annual actuarial valuation last preceding
the July 1 of a new fiscal year.
(3) Employer contribution rates as provided by this section shall include an employer
contribution rate to fund pension benefits and an employer contribution rate to fund
retiree health benefits.
(4) The employer contribution rate established by the board for the County Employees
Retirement System that is payable on or after July 1, 2018, and until June 30, 2028,
for the pension and retiree health insurance funds, including the normal cost
contribution and the actuarially accrued liability contribution for each fund, shall
not increase by more than a factor of one and twelve one hundredths (1.12) over the
prior fiscal year's employer contribution rate as determined by the system's
consulting actuary.
(5) The system shall advise each employer prior to the beginning of each fiscal year of
any change in the employer contribution rate. Based on the employer contribution
rate, each employer shall include in the budget sufficient funds to pay the employer
Page 31 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
contributions as determined by the board under this section.
Section 7. KRS 78.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The members' account shall be the account to which:
(a) All members' contributions, or contributions picked up by the employer after
August 1, 1982, and interest allowances as provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852
shall be credited, except as provided by KRS 78.5536(3)(b); and
(b) For members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1,
2014, the employer pay credit and interest credited on such amounts as
provided by KRS 78.5512 and 78.5516 shall be credited.
Only funds from this account shall be used to return the accumulated contributions
or accumulated account balances of a member when required to be returned to him
or her by reason of any provision of KRS 78.510 to 78.852. Prior to the member's
retirement, death, or refund in accordance with KRS 61.625, no funds shall be made
available from the member account.
(2) Each member's contribution or contribution picked up by the employer shall be
credited to the individual account of the contributing member, except as provided
by KRS 78.5536(3)(b).
(3) (a) Each member shall have his or her individual account credited with interest on
June 30 of each year.
(b) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, interest
shall be credited to his or her individual account at a rate determined by the
board but not less than two percent (2%) per annum on the accumulated
account balance of the member on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.
(c) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, interest shall be credited to his or her individual
account at a rate of two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum on the
accumulated contributions of the member on June 30 of the preceding fiscal
Page 32 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1970
year.
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the
hybrid cash balance plan, interest shall be credited in accordance with KRS
78.5512 and 78.5516.
(e) The amounts of interest credited to a member's account under this subsection
shall be transferred from the retirement allowance account.
(4) (a) Upon the retirement of a member who began participating in the system prior
to January 1, 2014, his or her accumulated account balance shall be
transferred from the members' account to the retirement allowance account.
(b) Upon the retirement of a member who began participating in the system on or
after January 1, 2014, who elects to annuitize his or her accumulated account
balance as prescribed by KRS 78.5512(7)(a) or (b) or 78.5516(7)(a) or (b), the
member's accumulated account balance shall be transferred to the retirement
allowance account.
(c) Upon the conversion of any Tier III benefits to Tier II benefits as provided
by Sections 1 and 5 of this Act, the member's accumulated employer credit
attributable to service converted to Tier II benefits as provided by Sections 1
or 5 of this Act shall be transferred to the retirement allowance account.
Section 8. This Act shall be effective July 1, 2027.
Page 33 of 33
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:35 PM Jacketed